Nevada, session 83, SB332.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 598 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A person shall not make a bad-faith claim or assertion of
copyright infringement.
2. The trier of fact may consider the following factors as
evidence that a person has made a bad-faith claim or assertion of
copyright infringement:
(a) The demand sent by the person does not contain all of the
following information:
(1) The copyright registration number assigned by the
United States Copyright Office, if any, or the number
accompanying an application made to the United States Copyright
Office, if any;
(2) The name and address of the copyright owner or owners
and assignee or assignees, if any;
(3) Factual allegations concerning the specific areas in
which the work of the person against whom the claim or assertion
is made infringes the copyright-protected work; and
(4) An explanation of why the person making the claim or
assertion has standing, if the United States Copyright Office does
not identify the person asserting the copyright as the owner.
(b) Before sending the demand, the person failed to conduct
an analysis comparing the copyright protected work to the asserted
infringing work, or the analysis was done but does not identify
specific areas in which the asserted infringing work infringes the
person’s copyright.
(c) The demand lacks the information described in this
subsection, the person against whom the claim or assertion is
made requests the information and the person fails to provide the
information within a reasonable period.
(d) The person demands payment of a license fee or a response
within an unreasonably short time.
(e) The person offers to settle the claim or assertion of
copyright infringement for an amount that is not based on a
reasonable estimate of the value of the copyright-protected work,
or the person offers to settle the claim or assertion for an amount
that is based on the cost of defending a potential or actual lawsuit.
(f) The claim or assertion of copyright is meritless and the
person knew or should have known that the claim or assertion is
meritless.
(g) The claim or assertion of copyright infringement is
deceptive.
-
*SB332*

– 3 –
(h) The person or the subsidiaries or affiliates of the person
have previously or concurrently filed or threatened to file one or
more lawsuits based on the same or similar claim of copyright
infringement, and:
(1) Those threats or lawsuits lacked the information
described in this subsection; or
(2) The person attempted to enforce the claim of copyright
infringement in litigation and a court found the claim to be
meritless.
(i) The person sent the same demand or substantially the same
demand to multiple recipients and made assertions against a wide
variety of works without reflecting those differences in a
reasonable manner in the demands.
(j) The person is aware of, but does not disclose, any final,
nonfinal or preliminary finding of invalidity involving the
copyright.
(k) The person seeks an injunction that is objectively
unreasonable under the law.
(l) Any other relevant factor.
3. The trier of fact may consider the following factors as
evidence that a person has not made a bad-faith assertion of
copyright infringement:
(a) The demand sent by the person contains the information
described in subsection 1.
(b) If the demand lacks the information described in
subsection 1 and the person against whom the claim or assertion
is made requests the information, the person provides the
information within a reasonable period.
(c) The person engages in a good-faith effort to establish that
the person against whom the claim or assertion is made has
infringed the copyright and to negotiate an appropriate and
reasonable remedy.
(d) The person makes a substantial investment in the use or
exploitation of the copyright.
(e) The person is:
(1) The author or joint author of the copyright-protected
work;
(2) The original assignee, in the case of a copyright-
protected work filed by and awarded to an assignee or claimant of
the original author or joint author; or
(3) An institution of higher education or a fine arts
organization owned or affiliated with an institution of higher
education.
-
*SB332*

– 4 –
(f) The person has demonstrated good-faith business practices
in previous efforts to enforce the copyright-protected work, or a
substantially similar copyright-protected work, through litigation.
(g) Any other factor the court finds relevant.
4. A person aggrieved by a violation of subsection 1 may
bring an action against the person who committed the violation to
seek any or all of the following relief:
(a) Equitable relief.
(b) Actual damages.
(c) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
(d) Exemplary damages in an amount that is equal to the
greater of:
(1) Thirty thousand dollars; or
(2) Three times the sum of:
(I) Actual damages; and
(II) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
5. A court may award to a defendant who prevails in an
action brought pursuant to subsection 4 reasonable attorney’s fees
and costs if the court finds that the action was not well-grounded
in fact and warranted by existing law or was interposed for any
improper purpose, such as to harass or to cause an unnecessary
delay or a needless increase in the cost of litigation.
6. A violation of subsection 1 constitutes a deceptive trade
practice for the purposes of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive.
7. The provisions of this section:
(a) Apply to a claim or assertion of copyright infringement
arising under 17 U.S.C. § 106 or 17 U.S.C. § 512.
(b) Do not apply to a claim or assertion of copyright
infringement:
(1) Arising under 17 U.S.C. § 106A; or
(2) By or on behalf of a person that is recognized as exempt
pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26
U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).
(c) Do not apply to a claim or assertion of a violation of NRS
597.720 to 597.760, inclusive.
8. Subject to the provisions of subsections 1, 2 and 3, and so
long as the activities are not carried out in bad faith, nothing in
this section shall be construed to prohibit any person who owns or
has the right to license or enforce a copyright or copyright-
protected work to do any of the following:
(a) Advise others of that ownership or right of license or
enforcement;
(b) Communicate to others that the copyright is available for
license or sale;
-
*SB332*

– 5 –
(c) Notify another person of the infringement of the copyright;
or
(d) Seek compensation for a past or present infringement or
for a license to the copyright.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Affiliate” means a business establishment, business or
other legal entity that wholly or substantially owns, is wholly or
substantially owned by or is under common ownership with
another entity.
(b) “Demand” means a letter, electronic mail message or other
communication asserting or claiming that a person has engaged
in copyright infringement.
(c) “Institution of higher education” has the meaning ascribed
to it in 20 U.S.C. § 1001(a).
(d) “Person” includes a governmental entity.
Sec. 2. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
1. Copyright encourages creativity and innovation by
protecting original works. Copyright holders have legitimate rights
to enforce their copyrights.
2. The Legislature does not wish to interfere with good-faith
copyright litigation or the good-faith enforcement of copyrights. The
Legislature recognizes that Nevada is preempted from passing any
law that conflicts with federal copyright law.
3. Copyright litigation can be complex and expensive. The
expense of copyright litigation can be a significant burden on
Nevadans, Nevada businesses and the State of Nevada. The
Legislature wishes to help avoid these costs by encouraging the
most efficient resolution of copyright infringement claims without
conflicting with federal law.
4. The Legislature seeks, by this narrowly tailored act, to strike
a balance between the interests of efficient and prompt resolution of
copyright infringement claims, protection of Nevadans, Nevada
businesses and the State of Nevada from bad-faith assertions of
copyright infringement and the intentions to respect federal law and
be careful not to interfere with legitimate copyright enforcement
actions.
H
-
*SB332*